Maryland, session 2026, HB0986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
8–307.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board may issue a license by
endorsement and waive any appropriate examination requirement of this title for an
applicant who has an active unencumbered license to practice registered nursing or
licensed practical nursing in any other state or country.
(b) The Board may issue a license by endorsement under this section only if the
applicant:
(1) Submits to the Board an application on the form that the Board
requires;
(2) Submits to a criminal history records check in accordance with § 8–303
of this subtitle;
(3) Pays the application fee set by the Board under § 8–304 of this subtitle;
and
(4) (i) 1. A. Holds a valid, unencumbered multistate license
under the Nurse Licensure Compact; AND
B. IF REQUIRED BY THE BOARD, PROVIDES ADEQUATE
EVIDENCE, INCLUDING OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPTS, THAT THE APPLICANT’S
EDUCATIONAL CREDENTIALS MEET THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER §
8–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE; or
2. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,
provides adequate evidence that:
A. At the time the applicant graduated from a nursing
education program approved in the other state or country, the program was substantially
equivalent to the education program approved in this State; and
B. At the time the applicant became licensed or registered in
the other state or country, the applicant passed in that or any other state or country an
examination that was similar to the examination that then was given in this State; and

HOUSE BILL 986 3
(ii) Meets the qualifications otherwise required by this title.
8–316.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 8–317 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a license or grant a license, including a license subject to a reprimand, probation, or
suspension, to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke the license of a licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(35) Has misappropriated the property of a patient or a facility; [or]
(36) Fails to comply with § 1–223 of this article; OR
(37) FAILS TO COMPLETE THE EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
8–7A–03.
(a) This Nurse Licensure Compact may not nullify any other provision in this title
or any other title applicable to the practice of nursing in the State.
(b) THIS NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT
THE AUTHORITY OF THE BOARD TO:
(1) INVESTIGATE THE QUALIFICATIONS OF AN APPLICANT FOR
LICENSURE OR A LICENSEE, INCLUDING THE SUFFICIENCY OF THE APPLICANT’S
NURSING EDUCATION; OR
(2) TAKE APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST AN
INTERSTATE LICENSEE, INCLUDING DENIAL OR REVOCATION OF LICENSURE.
(C) In any instance where this Nurse Licensure Compact is silent as to an issue,
the other provisions of this title and any regulations promulgated under this title shall
prevail.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.